South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3236.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  This act may be cited as the "Weapons Detector Systems in Schools Act." SECTION 2.  Chapter 63, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Article 10 Weapons Detector Systems in Schools Section 59-63-1010. (A) Weapons detector systems must be installed in the public entrances to all public elementary school, middle school, and high school buildings in the State, including athletic venues, and training must be provided to staff and volunteers concerning: (1) the appropriate use of such systems; and (2) protocol for responding to the detection of a weapon by the system. (B) All persons entering public school buildings and athletics venues when entering the buildings or venues must be screened by qualified personnel before entry may be allowed. A person who enters or attempts to enter such buildings or venues while refusing to comply with this screening requirement is guilty of a misdemeanor and must be sentenced to no more than thirty days incarceration, assessed a fine of no more than one hundred dollars, or both. (C) During the time needed to procure and install weapons detectors, schools shall procure and use handheld metal detectors. Section 59-63-1020. The State Department of Education shall promulgate regulations for: (1) the selection, implementation, use, and maintenance of weapons detector systems in schools; (2) standard protocol for system users to follow when the system detects a weapon; and (3) training for public school employees and volunteers in the appropriate use of these systems and the response protocol in item (2). Section 59-63-1030.  For purposes of this section, "weapons detector" includes metal detectors or any other means of screening for weapons as technology provides and the State Board of Education or a local school district board considers appropriate. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----